Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1250.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of transportation; State Route 87 turn lane The sum of $6,406,300 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation to construct a left turn lane at the intersection of southbound State Route 87 and East Malcolm X Street.